Hawaii statutes.
[§577E-6] Exemption from
administrative supervision of boards and commissions. Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, the commission shall be exempt from section 26-35 with the
exception of section [26-35(a)(2), (3), (7), and (8)]. [L 2003, c 156, pt of
§2; am L 2005, c 148, §2; ree L 2006, c 232, pt of §1; am L 2007, c 190, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next